Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.050

Review by superintendent of public instruction—Approval—Revised plan.

Subsequent to the holding of a hearing or hearings as provided in RCW 28A.540.040, the regional committee on school district organization shall determine the nonhigh school districts to be included in the plan and the amount of capital funds to be provided by every school district included therein, and shall submit the proposed plan to the superintendent of public instruction together with such maps and other materials pertaining thereto as the superintendent may require. The superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, shall review such plan, shall approve any plan which in his or her judgment makes adequate and satisfactory provision for participation by the nonhigh school districts in providing capital funds to be used for the purpose above stated, and shall notify the regional committee of such action. Upon receipt by the regional committee of such notification, the educational service district superintendent, or his or her designee, shall notify the board of directors of each school district included in the plan, supplying each board with complete details of the plan and shall state the total amount of funds to be provided and the amount to be provided by each district.

If any such plan submitted by a regional committee is not approved by the superintendent of public instruction, the regional committee shall be so notified, which notification shall contain a statement of reasons therefor and suggestions for revision. Within sixty days thereafter the regional committee shall submit to the superintendent a revised plan which revision shall be subject to approval or disapproval by the superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, and the procedural requirements and provisions of law applicable to an original plan submitted to the superintendent.

[ 2006 c 263 s 324; 1990 c 33 s 485; 1985 c 385 s 35; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 75; 1971 c 48 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.040. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 5; 1955 c 344 s 4; 1953 c 229 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.56.040, 28.56.040.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.